Massachusetts, session 194th, S2190.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any special or general law there shall be a special commission to study
the feasibility of integrating the use of conductive concrete in all public works developments and
projects.
A school of engineering within the state university of Massachusetts, in cooperation with
the findings of the University of Nebraska-Lincoln, shall conduct a study to determine the cost,
feasibility, effectiveness, and projected cost savings of using conductive concrete in future public
works projects to construct roads and sidewalks. For the purposes of this act, conductive concrete
shall mean a concrete compound that contains steel shavings and carbon particles to create
enough conductivity to melt ice and snow while remaining safe to the touch.
of 2

The special commission shall submit its recommendations, together with drafts of any
legislation, to the clerks of the House of Representatives and the Senate, and the chairs of the
joint committee on economic development and emerging technologies, the joint committee on
telecommunications, utilities and energy, and the joint committee on transportation not later than
December 1, 2026.
of 2